Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
LIMITING COMMERCIAL EXPLOITATION OF CRIME

§351-81 Deposit of copy of contract upon
indictment or charge of criminal offense. Every person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, or other legal entity upon entering into a contract
with any person indicted or charged with a criminal offense committed in this
State or a representative or assignee of any such person, shall submit a copy
of the contract to the commission if:

(1) The contract provides for monetary compensation
payable to the person indicted or charged or payable at the person's direction;
and

(2) The subject matter of the contract is the
reenactment of the crime, or the expression of the thoughts, feelings,
opinions, or emotions of the person about the criminal offense for which the
person is indicted or charged which is to be reflected in a movie, book,
article, radio or television program, or other form of communication. [L 1986,
c 155, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next